Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.05.040

Service on corporation.

Service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2120; 1989 c 165 s 43.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.